New York, session 2025-2026, A5180.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4401-a of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. With respect to a student who is registering with a school district 4 for the first time, a referral for initial evaluation as provided in 5 this section shall be made within forty-eight hours of the time of the 6 first contact between the school district and the person or entity 7 registering the student with the school district, provided a request for 8 referral has been made. A referral for evaluation shall not be delayed 9 until registration of the student has been completed. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, if 11 this act shall have become a law after June 30, 2026 it shall take 12 effect immediately and shall be deemed to have been in full force and 13 effect on and after June 30, 2026; and provided further, that the amend- 14 ments to section 4401-a of the education law made by section one of this 15 act shall survive the expiration and reversion of such section as 16 provided in subdivision d of section 27 of chapter 378 of the laws of 17 2007, as amended. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09215-01-5